Illinois, session 104th, HB3005.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 2705-627 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-627 new)8    Sec. 2705-627. Mechanics workforce goals and report. 9    (a) By August 1 of each calendar year, the Department 10shall make a report in writing to the Governor and the General 11Assembly, stating in detail the Department's efforts in the 12prior fiscal year to fill open mechanics positions.13    (b) The report shall include:14        (1) The total number of mechanic positions within the 15    department for the previous fiscal year.16        (2) The number of mechanic positions that were 17    unfilled at any point during the previous fiscal year.18        (3) The duration of time each mechanic position 19    remained unfilled.20        (4) The number of mechanic positions filled during the 21    previous fiscal year.22        (5) A detailed report of any recruitment efforts or 23    initiatives undertaken to fill mechanic positions.  HB3005 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 09323 LNS 19381 b1    (c) The Department shall establish and maintain a goal of 2filling at least 85% of all authorized and budgeted mechanic 3positions within the Department in each fiscal year.4    (d) The General Assembly shall review the report and may 5request additional information or hold hearings regarding the 6Department's staffing levels, recruitment strategies, and 7efforts to meet the 85% workforce goal.